Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1757YH (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. 207 Section 1. Section 229.15, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. Not more than sixty days after the entry of a court order 3 for treatment of a patient pursuant to a report issued under 4 section 229.14, subsection 1 , paragraph âcâ , and thereafter 5 at successive intervals as ordered by the court but not to 6 exceed ninety days six months so long as that court order 7 remains in effect, the medical director of the facility or 8 the psychiatrist or psychiatric advanced registered nurse 9 practitioner treating the patient shall report to the court 10 which entered the order. The report shall state whether the 11 patientâs condition has improved, remains unchanged, or has 12 deteriorated, and shall indicate if possible the further 13 length of time the patient will require treatment by the 14 facility. If at any time the patient without good cause fails 15 or refuses to submit to treatment as ordered by the court, 16 the medical director shall at once so notify the court, which 17 shall order the patient hospitalized as provided by section 18 229.14, subsection 2 , paragraph âdâ , unless the court finds 19 that the failure or refusal was with good cause and that the 20 patient is willing to receive treatment as provided in the 21 courtâs order, or in a revised order if the court sees fit to 22 enter one. If at any time the medical director reports to 23 the court that in the directorâs opinion the patient requires 24 full-time custody, care, and treatment in a hospital, and the 25 patient is willing to be admitted voluntarily to the hospital 26 for these purposes, the court may enter an order approving 27 hospitalization for appropriate treatment upon consultation 28 with the chief medical officer of the hospital in which the 29 patient is to be hospitalized. If the patient is unwilling 30 to be admitted voluntarily to the hospital, the procedure for 31 determining involuntary hospitalization, as set out in section 32 229.14, subsection 2 , paragraph âdâ , shall be followed. 33